Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
In General
[Repealed]

§§ 23-1-1 and 23-1-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-1-1. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3256, 3257; 1906, § 3698; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6389; 1930, § 5865; 1942, § 3106; Laws, 1960, ch. 442]

§23-1-3. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3256, 3257; 1906, § 3699; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6390; 1930, § 5866; 1942, § 3107; Laws, 1948, ch. 308; Laws, 1952, ch. 391; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 32, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 566, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch 301, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 363, § 1]

§ 23-1-4.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 15, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

[Laws, 1975, ch. 513]

§§ 23-1-5 through 23-1-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-1-5. [Codes, 1942, § 3107-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 458, § 1]

§23-1-7. [Codes, 1942, § 3107-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 458, § 2]

§23-1-9. [Codes, 1942, § 3107-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 458, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 1]

§23-1-11. [Codes, 1942, § 3107-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 458, § 6]

§23-1-15. [Codes, 1942, § 3107-11; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 32, § 1]

§23-1-17. [Codes, 1942, § 3166; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§23-1-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3107-13; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 32, § 4; Laws, 1978, ch. 389, § 1]

§23-1-21 and23-1-23. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3107-14, 3107-15; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 32, §§ 5, 6]

§23-1-25. [Codes, 1942, § 3107.7; Laws, 1960, ch. 443]

§23-1-27. [Codes, 1942, § 3108.5; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex ch. 16; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 2]

§23-1-29. [Codes, 1942 § 3118.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 3]

§23-1-31. [Codes, 1942, § 3118.7; Laws, 1952, ch. 394; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 4]

§23-1-33. [Codes, 1906, § 3718; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6410; 1930, § 5878; 1942, § 3120; Laws, 1936, ch. 326; Laws, 1962, ch. 566, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 508, § 1]

§23-1-35. [Codes, 1930, § 5879; 1942, § 3121; Laws, 1944, ch. 170; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex ch. 18; Laws, 1962, chs. 566, 567; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 5]

§23-1-37. [Codes, 1930, § 5880 1942, § 3122]

§23-1-39. [Codes, 1906, § 3704; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6396; 1930, § 5881; 1942, § 3123; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 401, § 4]

§23-1-41. [Codes, 1906, § 3716; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6408; 1930, § 5886; 1942, § 3128.5; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 7]

§§23-1-43 through23-1-61. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3133-01 to 31330-10; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, §§ 8 to 17]

§23-1-63. [Codes, 1906, § 3726; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6417; 1930, § 5905; 1942, § 3152; Laws, 1910, ch. 209; Laws, 1950, ch. 499; Laws, 1952, ch. 379; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 18]

§23-1-65. [Codes, 1930, § 5906; 1942, § 3153; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 19]

§23-1-67. [Codes, 1906, § 3718; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6410; 1930, § 5877; 1942, § 3119; Laws, 1966, ch. 610, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 507, § 1; repealed Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33; amended Laws, 1972, ch. 366, § 1]